test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tuql_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tuʼļ: # Noun 213 'eng /est tuli/fin' - full paradigm
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Nom: tuʼļ
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Gen: tuʼl
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Par: tūlda
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Dat: tuʼllõn
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Ins: tuʼlkõks
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Ill: tuʼllõ
     tuʼļ+N+Sg+Ela: tuʼlstõ
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Nom: tuʼld
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Gen: tuʼld
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Par: tuʼļḑi
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Dat: tuʼldõn
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Ins: tuʼldkõks
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Ill: tuļīž
     tuʼļ+N+Pl+Ela: tuʼļšti
